Alabama, session 2026rs, HB504.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 9 of Act 2022-279, 2022 Regular
Session, is amended to read as follows:
"Section 9. (a) The judge of probate may mail to any
person to whom a motor vehicle license has been previously
issued an application for renewal of a license required to be
returned prior to the expiration date of the license.
(b) The application for renewal may be in the form of a
postcard and shall contain sufficient information to
adequately identify and process the renewal.
(c) The signature of the licensee on the application
and proper remittance shall constitute sufficient authority
for the judge of probate to issue the license and return the
license to the licensee by mail.
(d)(1) The county commission may establish a fee to be
entitled "Mail Order Fee" in an amount not to exceed three
dollars ($3) to pay the cost of this mailing procedure.
(2) The county commission may establish an alternative
fee, not to exceed a total of ten dollars ($10), for a
licensee who requests to receive a license plate or decal by
priority mail.
(e) The fee shall be collected by the judge of probate
at the time of issuance and paid over to the general fund of
Page 1

at the time of issuance and paid over to the general fund of
HB504 Enrolled
the county as are other fees and commissions.
(f) The judge of probate may charge up to five dollars
($5) for the cost of mailing any other probate document."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB504 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 26-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 11-Mar-26 Passed



Page 3